Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1782.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Constitution Day is a Federal observance recognized in all 50 states.(2) The United States Congress designated September 17 as Constitution Day on February 29, 1962, by joint resolution.(3) An amendment filed to the Federal omnibus spending bill of 2004 mandates that all publicly funded educational institutions and Federal agencies provide educational programs on the history of the United States Constitution on that day.(4) The celebration of Constitution Day allows for the widespread consideration of events contributing to the 123456789101112131415161718 founding of the United States and provides opportunities for education on the nation's cultural heritage.(5) Constitution Day acknowledges the rights, freedoms and liberties of United States citizens as protected under a written Constitution.(6) Publicly funded schools and universities in the Commonwealth should encourage educational programs surrounding the history of the United States Constitution on the day of September 17, or on preceding or following weeks should the original date fall on a weekend or other observed holiday.Section 2. Designation.In accordance with the official day recognized by the Federal Government, September 17 shall be designated as "Constitution Day" in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat Constitution Day as a legal or official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on Constitution Day solely by virtue of the date being designated under this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1782PN2191 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223